Hawaii statutes.
§11-16 Application when not made in person.
(a) Any qualified person unable for any cause to appear in person before the
clerk for registration may register to vote by mail, not later than thirty days
prior to a primary or general election, through the affidavit on application
for voter registration or other form prescribed by the chief election officer.
The form shall include a self‑subscribing oath for the applicant to swear
to the truth of the allegations in the application. An applicant unable to write
for reason of illiteracy, blindness, or other physical disability shall have
the applicant's mark witnessed by a person who shall sign the affidavit in the
space provided. Each application form shall also include a space to request a
permanent absentee ballot. Application forms shall be made available to any
qualified person through community groups, political parties, and other groups
prescribed by the chief election officer. Application forms shall be made
available to any qualified person at the time of that person's driver's license
application or renewal through the examiner of drivers.

(b) Upon receipt of the properly executed
application, the clerk shall proceed to number the same and register the name
of the voter in the general county register as provided in section 11-15. In
registering persons under this section the clerk may accept requests for
absentee ballot submitted in accordance with the Federal Voting Assistance Act
of 1955 or other similar federal law as being sufficient for registration
purposes. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 45, §4; am L 2011,
c 142, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next